Utah, session 2026, HB312.
Section 1. Section 53E-3-1002 is amended to read:53E-3-1002Effective 07/01/26. Literacy coaching -- Professional learning.(1)Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall provide, train, and assign literacy coaches to schools with low literacy achievement performance to provide early literacy coaching to teachers in kindergarten through grade 3, in accordance with this section.(2)The state board shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:(a)establish criteria to determine which schools qualify for early literacy coaching, prioritizing coaching among:(i)schools that participate in partnerships that receive grants under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program; and(ii)schools that fall within the bottom 25% of all schools in literacy achievement performance, as the state board further defines;(b)establish minimum qualifications for early literacy coach positions to ensure adequate preparation with necessary expertise;(c)define roles and responsibilities for a literacy coach, including:(i)assisting educators in analyzing data to inform instructional adjustments;(ii)engaging in instructional coaching cycles with educators to build capacity for improved classroom instructional practices;(iii)using principles of adult learning to effectively partner with educators to integrate professional learning into classroom practice;(iv)leveraging knowledge of the science of reading and evidence-based practices to support educators in maximizing student learning;(v)partnering with a school's leader to support school-wide literacy goals to provide a team of support for educators to embed the state-wide goals into instructional plans and practice;(vi)delivering consistent and frequent job-embedded professional learning;(vii)participating actively in professional learning experiences to deepen knowledge and skills for coaching; and(viii)designing and facilitating relevant and cohesive professional learning sessions to strengthen the implementation of these evidence-based practices with educators; and(ix)beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, supporting the integration of social studies content into literacy instruction to enhance both reading comprehension and content knowledge, in alignment with the requirements of Section 53E-4-205.3; and(d)establish parameters for the relationship between a literacy coach and school or LEA, including ensuring that coaches do not engage in activities or duties unrelated to literacy coaching, including:(i)serving as an evaluator, substitute teacher, clerical aid, recess or lunch aid, behavioral therapist, tester, guidance counselor, interventionist, program manager, or contest leader; or(ii)any other assignment that frequently disrupts the coach's ability to support educators in improving instructional practice.(3)The state board shall:(a)ensure that one staff position supervises early literacy coaches statewide;(b)select the pool of candidates for literacy coaching positions and coordinate with LEAs regarding interviews, final selection, and placement; and(c)annually review coaching placements and adjust placements as necessary, based on the school's literacy achievement performance and the criteria established under Subsection (2).(4)The state board shall provide professional learning support in early literacy by:(a)facilitating professional learning opportunities to support literacy coaches statewide that includes knowledge and skill development in adult learning practices, job-embedded coaching, and family engagement;(b)providing professional learning regional consultants to:(i)support LEAs and regional education service agencies in designing, facilitating, monitoring, and adjusting professional learning in early literacy that aligns with the professional learning standards described in Section 53G-11-303; and(ii)serve a cohort of LEAs within a geographic region of the state; and(c)providing statewide professional learning to support the use of collective efficacy, including the implementation of professional learning communities and school leadership teams through 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-3-1004 is amended to read:53E-3-1004Effective 07/01/26. Community engagement for early literacy.(1)The state board shall:(a)partner with a private business or nonprofit organization to annually provide personal, home-use, age-appropriate printed books or digital books with accompanying electronic reading devices to students:(i)who attend:(A)a school that participates in partnerships that receive grants under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program; or(B)a Title I school, as that term is defined in Section 53F-2-523; and(ii)at a minimum, in kindergarten through grade 3; and(b)provide students a choice of language where possible.(2)The state board shall develop and promote a website that provides resources for teachers and other educational support personnel to: (a)support targeted activities and strategies for parents to support at-home reading.; and(b)beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, integrate social studies content with literacy instruction, supporting both early literacy goals and social studies learning objectives described in Section 53E-4-205.3.(3)The state board shall contract with one or more organizations that have expertise in coordinating community resources to:(a)provide training and coaching to community, school, and parent engagement coordinators; and(b)for a school that is not participating in a partnership that receives a grant under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program:(i)assess the presence of existing community school infrastructure; and(ii)provide necessary supports for parent, community, and business engagement, including services and coordination support.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-4-202 is amended to read:53E-4-202Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 01/01/28. Core standards for Utah public schools -- Notice and hearing requirements.(1)(a)In establishing minimum standards related to curriculum and instruction requirements under Section 53E-3-501, the state board shall, in consultation with local school boards, school superintendents, teachers, employers, and parents implement core standards for Utah public schools that will enable students to, among other objectives:(i)(a)communicate effectively, both verbally and through written communication;(ii)(b)apply mathematics; and(iii)(c)access, analyze, and apply information.; and(d)understand history and government as described in Section 53G-10-302.(b)(2)Except as provided in this public education code, the state board may recommend but may not require a local school board or charter school governing board to use:(i)(a)a particular curriculum or instructional material; or(ii)(b)a model curriculum or instructional material.(2)(3)The state board shall, in establishing the core standards for Utah public schools:(a)identify the basic knowledge, skills, and competencies each student is expected to acquire or master as the student advances through the public education system; and(b)align with each other the core standards for Utah public schools and the assessments described in Section 53E-4-303.(3)(4)The basic knowledge, skills, and competencies identified pursuant toin accordance with Subsection (2)(a)(1)(a) shall increase in depth and complexity from year to year and focus on consistent and continual progress within and between grade levels and courses in the basic academic areas of:(a)English, including explicit phonics, spelling, grammar, reading, writing, vocabulary, speech, and listening; and(b)mathematics, including basic computational skills.; and(c)beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, social studies, including history and government as described in Section 53G-10-302.(4)(5)Before adopting core standards for Utah public schools, the state board shall:(a)publicize draft core standards for Utah public schools for the state, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 90 days;(b)invite public comment on the draft core standards for Utah public schools for a period of not less than 90 days; and(c)conduct three public hearings that are held in different regions of the state on the draft core standards for Utah public schools.(5)(6)LEA governing boards shall design their school programs, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, to focus on the core standards for Utah public schools with the expectation that each program will enhance or help achieve mastery of the core standards for Utah public schools.(6)(7)Except as provided in Sections 53G-10-103 and 53G-10-402, each school may select instructional materials and methods of teaching, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, that the school considers most appropriate to meet the core standards for Utah public schools.(7)(8)The state may exit any agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or consortium that cedes control of the core standards for Utah public schools to any other entity, including a federal agency or consortium, for any reason, including:(a)the cost of developing or implementing the core standards for Utah public schools;(b)the proposed core standards for Utah public schools are inconsistent with community values; or(c)the agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or consortium:(i)was entered into in violation of Chapter 3, Part 8, Implementing Federal or National Education Programs, or Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act;(ii)conflicts with Utah law;(iii)requires Utah student data to be included in a national or multi-state database;(iv)requires records of teacher performance to be included in a national or multi-state database; or(v)imposes curriculum, assessment, or data tracking requirements on home school or private school students.(8)(9)The state board shall:(a)submit a report in accordance with Section 53E-1-203 on the development and implementation of the core standards for Utah public schools, including the time line established for the review of the core standards for Utah public schools; and(b)ensure that the report described in Subsection (8)(a)(9)(a) includes the time line established for the review of the core standards for Utah public schools by a standards reviewadvisory committee and the recommendations of a standards reviewadvisory committee established under Section 53E-4-203.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53E-4-204 is amended to read:53E-4-204Effective 07/01/26. Standards and graduation requirements.(1)The state board shall establish rigorous core standards for Utah public schools and graduation requirements under Section 53E-3-501 for grades 9 through 12 that:(a)are consistent with state law and federal regulations;(b)use competency-based standards and assessments;(c)include instruction that stresses general financial literacy from basic budgeting to financial investments, including bankruptcy education and a general financial literacy test-out option;(d)include graduation requirements in language arts, mathematics, and science that exceed:(i)3.0 units in language arts including up to 0.5 units emphasizing verbal communication completed in a course or a school sponsored activity;(ii)2.0 units in mathematics; and(iii)and 2.0 units in science; and(e)include a graduation requirement in social studies that is equal to or exceeds 3.5 units, including at least 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship as described in Section 53E-4-205.2;(e)include a graduation requirement in social studies that is equal to or exceeds 3.5 units, including:(i)at least 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship as described in Section 53E-4-205.2, consisting of two distinct semester courses that may not be duplicated to satisfy the requirement; and(ii)at least 1.0 unit in United States history, consisting of two distinct semester courses that may not be duplicated to satisfy the requirement; and(f)ensure up to 0.5 units of the 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship described in Subsection (1)(e)(1)(e)(i) may be earned by:(i)completing a course or a school sponsored activity emphasizing verbal communication provided that a significant portion of the course or activity is dedicated to civic education, including:(A)policy analysis;(B)governmental systems; and(C)civic engagement; or(ii)participation in the Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps described in 10 U.S.C. Sec. 2031.(2)The state board shall establish competency-based standards and assessments for elective courses.(3)The state board shall study requiring all LEAs to issue a high school diploma to students who receive:(a)an associate's degree with at least 60 credit hours from an accredited post-secondary institution; or(b)an industry certification with at least 500 hours of instruction from a business, trade association, or other industry group in accordance with Section 53E-3-501.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53E-4-205.3 is enacted to read:53E-4-205.3Effective 07/01/26. Elementary social studies education.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Elementary grades" or "elementary grade level" means kindergarten through grade 6.(b)"Integrated instruction" means teaching that purposefully connects social studies content with other subject areas.(c)"Social studies" means the integrated study of history, geography, civics, and economics as outlined in the state board's standards for social studies.(2)The board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing standards to ensure that LEAs provide regular social studies instruction in each elementary grade level.(3)The state superintendent shall:(a)develop guidelines for integrating, where appropriate, social studies instruction with English language arts and mathematics;(b)develop and maintain a repository of social studies instructional materials and resources;(c)establish criteria for qualifying integrated instruction; and(d)develop methods to measure student progress in social studies learning.(4)An LEA shall:(a)ensure that students in elementary grades receive regular social studies instruction required in Subsection (2);(b)in accordance with Section 53G-10-304, adopt social studies curricula that meet state standards;(c)ensure all elementary students have access to appropriate social studies materials;(d)provide resources to support integrated instruction;(e)ensure that elementary teachers receive ongoing professional development in social studies instruction, including integrated instruction;(f)regularly assess student progress in social studies; and(g)use data to inform instruction and support.(5)An LEA shall implement all requirements of this section by July 1, 2031.(6)Upon request, the board shall report to the Education Interim Committee on implementation progress and initial outcomes.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53E-4-303 is amended to read:53E-4-303Effective 07/01/26. Utah standards assessments -- Administration -- Advisory committee.(1)As used in this section,: (a)"computer"Computer adaptive assessment" means an assessment that measures the range of a student's ability by adapting to the student's responses, selecting more difficult or less difficult questions based on the student's responses.(b)"Founding document" means a document described in Subsections 53E-4-205.2 and 53G-10-302(4).(2)The state board shall:(a)adopt a standards assessment that:(i)measures a student's proficiency in:(A)mathematics for students in each of grades 3 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 3 through 10 after July 1, 2026;(B)English language arts for students in each of grades 3 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 3 through 10 after July 1, 2026;(C)science for students in each of grades 4 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 4 through 10 after July 1, 2026; and(D)writing for students in at least grades 5 and 8; and(ii)except for the writing measurement described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(D), is a computer adaptive assessment; and(b)ensure that an assessment described in Subsection (2)(a) is:(i)a criterion referenced assessment;(ii)administered online;(iii)aligned with the core standards for Utah public schools; and(iv)adaptable to personalized, competency-based learning, as that term is defined in Section 53F-5-501.; and(c)beginning on or after the 2028-2029 school year, the board shall establish a timeline to incorporate questions derived from primary source documents and founding documents into the English language arts assessment described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(B).(3)A school district or charter school shall annually administer the standards assessment adopted by the state board under Subsection (2) to all students in the subjects and grade levels described in Subsection (2).(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), a student's score on the standards assessment adopted under Subsection (2) may not be considered in determining:(i)the student's academic grade for a course; or(ii)whether the student may advance to the next grade level.(b)A teacher may use a student's score on the standards assessment adopted under Subsection (2) to improve the student's academic grade for or demonstrate the student's competency within a relevant course.(5)(a)The state board shall establish a committee consisting of 15 parents of Utah public education students to review all standards assessment questions.(b)The committee established in Subsection (5)(a) shall include the following parent members:(i)five members appointed by the chair of the state board;(ii)five members appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives or the speaker's designee; and(iii)five members appointed by the president of the Senate or the president's designee.(c)The state board shall provide staff support to the parent committee.(d)The term of office of each member appointed in Subsection (5)(b) is four years.(e)The chair of the state board, the speaker of the House of Representatives, and the president of the Senate shall adjust the length of terms to stagger the terms of committee members so that approximately half of the committee members are appointed every two years.(f)No member may receive compensation or benefits for the member's service on the committee.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 53E-4-409 is enacted to read:53E-4-409Effective 07/01/26. Open educational resources -- Development and implementation.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Open educational resources" means teaching, learning, and research materials that are in the public domain or released under an open license that permits free use, adaptation, and distribution.(b)"Utah core standards" means the standards described in Section 53E-4-202.(2)Notwithstanding any other provision in this part, and subject to legislative appropriation, the state superintendent shall:(a)develop comprehensive open educational resources that:(i)may include resources for grades kindergarten through grade 12;(ii)align with Utah core standards;(iii)are age appropriate for the grade level in which the materials are developed;(iv)reflect Utah values as described in Section 53G-10-204;(v)provide accessibility to students with disabilities in compliance with federal and state law;(vi)are available in digital and, where appropriate, print formats;(vii)do not contain obscene or harmful material;(viii)are age appropriate for the grade level; and(ix)promote American values and civic understanding.(b)ensure the open educational resources may include:(i)comprehensive instructional materials for all core subject areas;(ii)teacher resources;(iii)student materials and resources;(iv)implementation guides to support LEAs in the adoption and use of the materials;(c)establish quality standards and review processes for materials developed under this section;(d)ensure that:(i)the state owns all intellectual property rights, including copyright, in the open educational resources developed under this section; and(ii)the open educational resources are openly licensed under a Creative Commons or equivalent license to allow an LEA to use, adapt, customize, and distribute the materials without charge;(e)make the open educational resources available through a centralized digital platform accessible to all LEAs and the public; and(f)ensure that the open educational resources developed under this section are clearly labeled and identified as open educational resources in all formats and platforms to provide transparency to parents and other stakeholders.(3)In identifying, contracting, and developing open educational resources under this section, the state superintendent shall:(a)consult with LEAs, teachers, curriculum specialists, and other education stakeholders;(b)establish an advisory committee that:(i)includes individuals representing:(A)LEAs;(B)parents;(C)teachers;(D)curriculum specialists; and(E)other education stakeholders; and(ii)reviews all open educational resources before the resources are made available for LEA adoption;(iii)provide opportunities for public comment on draft open educational resources before final release;(c)establish timelines for phased development and implementation; and(d)ensure ongoing review and updates to maintain alignment with Utah core standards and educational best practices.(4)(a)The state board may not require an LEA to adopt or use the open educational resources developed under this section.(b)An LEA that chooses to adopt the open educational resources developed under this section shall use the LEA's existing curriculum approval process.(5)(a)The state board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act to implement this section.(b)Upon request, report to the Education Interim Committee regarding the progress and implementation of this section.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 53G-10-302 is amended to read:53G-10-302Effective 07/01/26. Instruction in American history and government -- Study and posting of American heritage documents.(1)As used in this section,:(a)"American experiment in self-governance and United States founding principles" means the unique characteristics and achievements of the United States, including:(i)the nation's founding principles of individual liberty, limited government, and natural rights;(ii)the enduring strength and adaptability of the United States Constitution;(iii)the protection of individual freedoms and religious liberty;(iv)supporting and preserving the family;(v)economic prosperity through free market capitalism and entrepreneurship;(vi)the promotion of human rights and representative self-government globally; and(vii)the contributions of American innovation, culture, and civil society to human progress and flourishing.(b)"Communism" means a system of government, governance, or political theory that has historically resulted in widespread human rights abuses, economic failure, and totalitarian oppression, characterized by:(i)collective or state ownership of property and the means of production;(ii)centralized economic planning;(iii)single-party authoritarian rule;(iv)practices that are destructive to the family structure and function; or(v)suppression of individual rights and liberties in favor of collective goals.(c) "Ten Commandments" means the Decalogue, known as the Ten Commandments, as recorded in the Hebrew Scriptures in Exodus 20:2-17 and Deuteronomy 5:6-21.(2)The Legislature recognizes that a proper understanding of American history and government is essential to good citizenship, and that the public schools are the primary public institutions charged with responsibility for assisting children and youth in gaining that understanding.(3)(a)TheIn accordance with Section 53G-10-204, the state board and local school boards shall periodically review school curricula and activities to ensure that effective instruction in American history and government is taking place in the public schools.(b)The boards shall solicit public input as part of the review process.(c)The state board shall ensure instruction in American history and government for students occurs as appropriate and includes a study of:(i)forms of government, such as a republic, a pure democracy, a monarchy, and an oligarchy;(ii)political philosophies and economic systems, such as socialism, communism, individualism, and free market capitalism;(iii)the United States' form of government, a compound constitutional republic;(iv)the roles and responsibilities of government officials, including all state and locally elected officials;(v)the voting process and election laws of this state, including the caucus and convention system;(vi)the purpose and benefits of the Electoral College system in presidential elections, including:(A)how the system protects state sovereignty;(B)ensures broad geographic representation; and(C)maintains the federal nature of the republic;(vii)the eligibility requirements to run for elected office at the federal, state, and local levels; and(viii)the elected officials who represent students at each level of government.(d)Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the state board shall ensure that social studies core standards for students in secondary grades include comparative instruction on government systems, including communism, with the state board determining the specific grades and frequency of instruction within secondary grades, that:(i)compare and contrast the government systems described in Subsection (3)(c) with communism and other autocratic government systems, such as:(A)fascist governments, including World War II-era regimes; and(B)ancient autocracies, including absolute monarchies;(ii)include instruction on the American experiment in self-governance and United States founding principles, including why the Founders rejected pure democracy, including ancient Greek examples;(iii)include instruction on the fundamental characteristics of communism, including state control of information and media;(iv)include instruction on the history and tactics of communist movements in the United States, including:(A)the spread of communist ideology during the 20th century;(B)efforts to infiltrate American institutions; and(C)the response of the United States government and civil society to communist movements;(v)include instruction on historical crimes, human rights violations, and economic failures caused by communist regimes, including:(A)the Cultural Revolution in China;(B)the Holodomor in Ukraine;(C)the Great Terror in the Soviet Union;(D)the Cambodian genocide under the Khmer Rouge;(E)the human rights violations and economic failures of the Cuban communist regime;(F)the violence and destabilization caused by communist guerrilla movements in Latin America; and(G)the systematic persecution of religious groups and suppression of religious practice under communist regimes; and(vi)include comparative outcomes demonstrating the benefits of constitutional republicanism through comparison with communist, pure democratic, and other autocratic systems, including:(A)economic prosperity and innovation;(B)protection of human rights and individual freedoms;(C)political stability and peaceful transfer of power;(D)quality of life and opportunity for citizens; and(E)contributions to global peace and prosperity.(e)Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, and in accordance with Subsection (8), the state board shall ensure instruction in American history and government for students occurs as appropriate and includes a study of the historical and philosophical context in which the founding documents were created, with the state board determining the specific grades and frequency of instruction within grades 3 through 12, including:(i)analysis of religious and philosophical references contained in founding documents, including:(A)the reference in the Declaration of Independence to "Nature's God," "Creator," "Supreme Judge of the world," and "divine Providence";(B)religious and philosophical influences on concepts of natural rights and limited government as reflected in primary source documents from the founding era;(C)the debates over religious liberty and the relationship between religion and government as reflected in founding era documents, including writings on the First Amendment;(D)specific passages from the text described in Subsection (4)(m) that are cited or alluded to in founding documents;(E)narratives and concepts from the text described in Subsection (4)(m) that shaped colonial American political thought;(F)the use of language and imagery from the text described in Subsection (4)(m) in political rhetoric of the founding era and throughout American history; and(G)influences of the text described in Subsection (4)(m) on concepts of covenant, law, justice, and liberty in American constitutional thought;(ii)comparative analysis of the philosophical traditions described in Subsection 53E-4-205.2(2)(a), and additional philosophical traditions, including Enlightenment philosophy, Protestant and Catholic thought, deism, and natural law theory; and(iii)the development of American principles of religious liberty, including:(A)the First Amendment's protections for religious exercise and prohibitions on religious establishment; and(B)state constitutional provisions on religious liberty.(c)Instruction in American history and government shall include a study of:(i)forms of government, such as a republic, a pure democracy, a monarchy, and an oligarchy;(ii)political philosophies and economic systems, such as socialism, individualism, and free market capitalism; and(iii)the United States' form of government, a compound constitutional republic.(4)School curricula and activities shall include a thorough study of historical documents and principles such asdescribed in Subsection 53E-4-205.2(3), and beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, may include the following additional historical documents and principles:(a)the Declaration of Independence;(b)the United States Constitution;(c)(a)the national motto;(d)(b)the pledge of allegiance;(e)(c)the national anthem;(d)the entirety of George Washington's Farewell Address;(f)the Mayflower Compact;(g)the writings, speeches, documents, and proclamations of the Founders and the Presidents of the United States;(h)organic documents from the pre-Colonial, Colonial, Revolutionary, Federalist, and post Federalist eras;(e)Frederick Douglass's speeches, including:(i) "What to the Slave is the Fourth of July," delivered July 5, 1852; and(ii)"What the Black Man Wants," delivered January 26, 1865;(f)selected passages from the Anti-Federalist Papers and the Federalist Papers, including Federalist Papers No. 10 and No. 51;(i)(g)United States Supreme Court decisions;(j)(h)the Ten Commandments;(k)(i)the Magna Carta;(l)(j)Acts of the United States Congress, including the published text of the Congressional Record; and(m)(k)United States treaties.;(l)excerpts from Alexis de Tocqueville's Democracy in America;(m)the Bible, including the Hebrew Scriptures and New Testament, as literary and historical texts that have influenced American constitutional history, civic thought, and cultural development; and(n)when teaching Utah history, an LEA may include study of religious beliefs and texts that influenced the state's early founders and the state's history.(5)To increase student understanding of, and familiarity with, American historical documents, public schools may display historically important excerpts from, or copies of, those documents in school classrooms and common areas as appropriate.(6)There shall be no content-based censorship of American history and heritage documents referred to in this section due to their religious or cultural nature.(7)Public schools shall display "In God we trust," which is declared in 36 U.S.C. Sec. 302 to be the national motto of the United States, in one or more prominent places within each school building.(8)An LEA shall ensure instruction provided under Subsections (4)(m), (4)(n), and (3)(e):(a)focuses on religious texts' literary forms, historical context, and documented influence on American civic thought and the state's founding history rather than on theological or doctrinal questions;(b)may use multiple translations of religious texts for comparative literary and historical analysis; and(c)acknowledges diverse interpretations of religious texts and their application to political thought and founding history.(9)The state board shall ensure that each review and revision of social studies core standards includes the requirements of this section.(10)Nothing in this section prohibits an LEA from exceeding the minimum standards established by the state board under this section.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 53G-10-307 is amended to read:53G-10-307Effective 07/01/26. Art or fine arts education -- Definition -- Credit requirements.(1)As used in this section,  "art" or "fine arts" means:(a)courses, instruction, or experiences in visual arts, music, dance, or theater;(b)courses, instruction, or experiences in applied crafts and technical arts that incorporate artistic elements, including:(i)woodworking;(ii)metalworking and welding;(iii)traditional handcrafts;(iv)architectural trades, including carpentry, plumbing, masonry, and stonework;(v)automotive design and customization;(vi)electrical and electrician work;(vi)(vii)digital design and animation; or(vii)(viii)other similar courses that combine technical skill with artistic expression; and(c)other forms of creative or interpretive expression as an LEA determines.(2)For purposes of meeting art or fine arts credit requirements the state board establishes, thean LEA shall accept for an art or fine arts credit any accept a course listed in Subsection (1) that meets the LEA's art or fine arts credit requirements if the course:(a)incorporates artistic or creative elements in the curriculum;(b)includes instruction in principles of design, form, or aesthetic expression; and(c)provides students opportunities for creative expression and artistic application of technical skills.(3)Nothing in this section:(a)prevents an LEA from:(i)establishing the LEA's own additional criteria for artistic and creative elements in courses accepted for fine arts creditcourses accepted for fine arts credit; or(ii)offering additional courses for fine arts credit; or(b)requires an LEA to offer all courses listed in Subsection (1).

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 63I-2-253 is amended to read:63I-2-253Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Title 53, Chapter 2c, COVID-19 Health and Economic Response Act, is repealed July 1, 2026.(2)Section 53-22-104.1, School Security Task Force -- Membership -- Duties -- Per diem -- Report -- Expiration, is repealed December 31, 2025.(3)Section 53-22-104.2, The School Security Task Force -- Education Advisory Board, is repealed December 31, 2025.(4)Section 53-25-103, Airport dangerous weapon possession reporting requirements, is repealed December 31, 2031.(5)Subsection 53-25-602(4)(b), regarding the rights of a peace officer placed onto a prosecution agency's Brady identification system before May 7, 2025, is repealed December 1, 2025.(6)Subsection 53-29-302(2)(b)(ii), regarding the requirement for the Department of Corrections to submit the results of risk assessments for sex offenders to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, is repealed January 1, 2030.(7)Section 53E-4-204.1, regarding ethnic studies core standards and curriculum requirements, is repealed July 1, 2026.(7)(8)Subsection 53E-3-501(7)(e)(ii), regarding a report on the packet method, is repealed July 1, 2028.(8)(9)Subsection 53F-2-504(6), regarding a report on the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators, is repealed July 1, 2026.(9)(10)Section 53F-5-221, Management of energy and water use pilot program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(10)(11)Section 53F-5-222, Mentoring and Supporting Teacher Excellence and Refinement Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(11)(12)Section 53F-5-223, Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(12)(13)Subsection 53G-11-502(1), regarding implementation of the educator evaluation process, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)(14)Section 53G-11-506, Establishment of educator evaluation program -- Joint committee, is repealed July 1, 2029.(14)(15)Section 53G-11-507, Components of educator evaluation program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(15)(16)Section 53G-11-508, Summative evaluation timelines -- Review of summative evaluations, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)(17)Section 53G-11-509, Mentor for provisional educator, is repealed July 1, 2029.(17)(18)Section 53G-11-510, State board to describe a framework for the evaluation of educators, is repealed July 1, 2029.(18)(19)Section 53G-11-511, Rulemaking for privacy protection, is repealed July 1, 2029.(19)(20)Subsection 53G-11-520(1), regarding optional alternative educator evaluation processes, is repealed July 1, 2029.(20)(21)Subsection 53G-11-520(2), regarding an exception from educator evaluation process requirements, is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 11:
Section 12.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.